Illinois, session 104th, SB3309.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Department of Natural Resources for grants to fund wetland 7protection, enhancement, and restoration projects in the State 8of Illinois. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.